Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Article 2. Public Records
§ 16-4-203.
Right of inspection; grounds for denial; access of news media; order permitting or restricting disclosure; exceptions.

The custodian of any public records shall allow any person the right of inspection of the records or any portion thereof except on one (1) or more of the following grounds or as provided in subsection (b) or (d) of this section:

The inspection would be contrary to any state statute;

The inspection would be contrary to any federal statute or regulation issued thereunder having the force and effect of law; or

The inspection is prohibited by rules promulgated by the supreme court or by the order of any court of record.

The custodian may deny the right of inspection of the following records, unless otherwise provided by law, on the ground that disclosure to the applicant would be contrary to the public interest:

Records of investigations conducted by, or of intelligence information or security procedures of, any sheriff, county attorney, city attorney, the attorney general, the state auditor, police department or any investigatory files compiled for any other law enforcement or prosecution purposes;

Test questions, scoring keys and other examination data pertaining to administration of a licensing examination and examination for employment or academic examination. Written promotional examinations and the scores or results thereof shall be available for inspection, but not copying or reproduction, by the person in interest after the examination has been conducted and graded;

The specific details of bona fide research projects being conducted by a governmental entity or any other person;

Except as otherwise provided by Wyoming statutes or for the owner of the property, the contents of real estate appraisals made for the governmental entity, relative to the acquisition of property or any interest in property for public use, until such time as title of the property or property interest has passed to the governmental entity. The contents of the appraisal shall be available to the owner of the property or property interest at any time;

Interagency or intraagency memoranda or letters which would not be available by law to a private party in litigation with the agency;

To the extent that the inspection would jeopardize the security of any structure owned, leased or operated by a governmental entity, facilitate the planning of a terrorist attack or endanger the life or physical safety of an individual, including:

Vulnerability assessments, specific tactics, emergency procedures or security procedures contained in plans or procedures designed to prevent or respond to terrorist attacks or other security threats;

Building plans, blueprints, schematic drawings, diagrams, operational manuals or other records that reveal the building’s or structure’s internal layout, specific location, life and safety and support systems, structural elements, surveillance techniques, alarms, security systems or technologies, operational and transportation plans or protocols, personnel deployments for airports and other mass transit facilities, bridges, tunnels, emergency response facilities or structures, buildings where hazardous materials are stored, arenas, stadiums and waste and water systems;

Records of any other building or structure owned, leased or operated by a governmental entity that reveal the building’s or structure’s life and safety systems, surveillance techniques, alarm or security systems or technologies, operational and evacuation plans or protocols or personnel deployments; and

Records prepared to prevent or respond to terrorist attacks or other security threats identifying or describing the name, location, pharmaceutical cache, contents, capacity, equipment, physical features, or capabilities of individual medical facilities, storage facilities or laboratories established, maintained, or regulated by a governmental entity.

An application for the position of president of an institution of higher education, letters of recommendation or references concerning the applicant and records or information relating to the process of searching for and selecting the president of an institution of higher education, if the records or information could be used to identify a candidate for the position. As used in this paragraph “institution of higher education” means the University of Wyoming and any community college in this state;

Sensitive wildlife location data in the custody of the game and fish department which could be used to determine the specific location of an individual animal or a group of animals.

If the right of inspection of any record falling within any of the classifications listed in this section is allowed to any officer or employee of any newspaper, radio station, television station or other person or agency in the business of public dissemination of news or current events, it may be allowed to all news media.

The custodian shall deny the right of inspection of the following records, unless otherwise provided by law:

Medical, psychological and sociological data on individual persons, exclusive of coroners’ verdicts and written dockets as provided in W.S. 7-4-105(a);

Adoption records or welfare records on individual persons;

Personnel files except those files shall be available to the duly elected and appointed officials who supervise the work of the person in interest. Applications, performance ratings and scholastic achievement data shall be available only to the person in interest and to the duly elected and appointed officials who supervise his work. Employment contracts, working agreements or other documents setting forth the terms and conditions of employment of public officials and employees are not considered part of a personnel file and shall be available for public inspection;

Letters of reference;

Trade secrets, privileged information and confidential commercial, financial, geological or geophysical data furnished by or obtained from any person;

Library, archives and museum material contributed by private persons, to the extent of any limitations placed thereon as conditions of the contributions;

Hospital records relating to medical administration, medical staff, personnel, medical care and other medical information, whether on individual persons or groups, or whether of a general or specific classification;

School district records containing information relating to the biography, family, physiology, religion, academic achievement and physical or mental ability of any student except to the person in interest or to the officials duly elected and appointed to supervise him;

Library patron transaction and registration records except as required for administration of the library or except as requested by a custodial parent or guardian to inspect the records of his minor child;

Information obtained through a 911 emergency telephone system or through a verification system for motor vehicle insurance or bond as provided under W.S. 31-4-103(e) except to law enforcement personnel or public agencies for the purpose of conducting official business, to the person in interest, or pursuant to a court order;

Records or information compiled solely for purposes of investigating violations of, and enforcing, internal personnel rules or personnel policies the disclosure of which would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;

Information regarding the design, elements and components, and location of state information technology security systems and physical security systems;

Records or information relating to individual diagnoses of contagious, infectious, communicable, toxic and genetic diseases maintained or collected by the Wyoming state veterinary laboratory as provided in W.S. 21-17-308(e);

Information concerning an agricultural operation, farming or conservation practice, a surface or subsurface resource or the land itself, if the information was provided by an agricultural producer or owner of agricultural land in order to participate in a program of a governmental entity. The custodian shall also deny the right of inspection to geospatial information maintained about the agricultural land or operations. Provided, however, that if otherwise permitted by law, the inspection of the information described in this paragraph shall be allowed in accordance with the following:

The custodian may allow the right of inspection when responding to a disease or pest threat to agricultural operations, if the custodian determines that a threat to agricultural operations exists and the disclosure of information is necessary to assist in responding to the disease or pest threat as authorized by law;

The custodian shall allow the right of inspection of payment information under a program of a governmental entity, including the names and addresses of recipients of payments;

The custodian shall allow the right of inspection if the information has been transformed into a statistical or aggregate form without naming:

Any individual owner, operator or producer; or

A specific data gathering site.

The custodian shall allow the right of inspection if the disclosure of information is pursuant to the consent of the agricultural producer or owner of the agricultural land;

As used in this paragraph:

“Agricultural operation” means the production and marketing of agricultural products or livestock;

“Agricultural producer” means any producer of livestock, crops or dairy products from an agricultural operation.

Within any record held by a governmental entity, any income tax return or any individual information derived by the governmental entity from an income tax return, however information derived from these documents may be released if sufficiently aggregated or redacted so that the persons or entities involved cannot be identified individually;

Except as required in a contested case hearing, any individual records involved in any workers’ compensation claim, however information derived from these documents may be released if sufficiently aggregated or redacted so that the persons or entities involved cannot be identified individually;

Any records of the consensus revenue estimating group as defined in W.S.

9-2-1002

, that discloses information considered by, or deliberations or tentative decisions of, the group;

Information obtained through a peace officer recording provided that:

The custodian shall allow the right of inspection to law enforcement personnel or public agencies for the purpose of conducting official business or pursuant to a court order;

The custodian may allow the right of inspection:

To the person in interest;

If the information involves an incident of deadly force or serious bodily injury as defined in W.S. 6-1-104(a)(x);

In response to a complaint against a law enforcement personnel and the custodian of the information determines inspection is not contrary to the public interest;

In the interest of public safety.

Any records of the investment funds committee, created by W.S.

9-4-720

, that disclose information considered by the committee, committee deliberations or tentative decisions of the committee;

Information related to legally taking wildlife as provided in W.S. 23-1-302(r).

If the custodian denies access to any public record, the applicant may request a written statement of the grounds for the denial. The statement shall cite the law or regulation under which access is denied and shall be furnished to the applicant.

Any person aggrieved by the failure of a governmental entity to release records on the specified date mutually agreed upon pursuant to W.S. 16-4-202(c)(iv) or by the failure of a governmental entity to comply with an order of the ombudsman pursuant to W.S. 16-4-202(c)(v) may:

Apply to the district court of the district wherein the record is found for an order to direct the custodian of the record to show cause why he should not permit the inspection of the record and to compel production of the record if applicable. An order issued by the district court under this paragraph may waive any fees charged by the state governmental entity;

File a complaint with the ombudsman who may:

Mediate disputes between the governmental entity and the person;

Prescribe timelines for release of the records;

Waive any fees charged by the governmental entity.

If, in the opinion of the official custodian of any public record, disclosure of the contents of the record would do substantial injury to the public interest, notwithstanding the fact that the record might otherwise be available to public inspection, he may apply to the district court of the district in which the record is located for an order permitting him to restrict disclosure. After hearing, the court may issue an order upon a finding that disclosure would cause substantial injury to the public interest. The person seeking permission to examine the record shall have notice of the hearing served upon him in the manner provided for service of process by the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure and has the right to appear and be heard.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the following applies to the Wyoming natural diversity database located at the University of Wyoming and any report prepared by the custodian from that database:

The custodian may charge a reasonable fee for searching the database and preparing a report from that database information. The interpretation of the database in a report shall not contain recommendations for restrictions on any public or private land use;

The custodian shall allow the inspection of all records in the database at a level of spatial precision equal to the township, but at no more precise level;

Research reports prepared by the custodian funded completely from nonstate sources are subject to paragraph (b) (iii) of this section;

Any record contained in the database pertaining to private land shall not be released by the University of Wyoming without the prior written consent of the landowner. Nothing in this paragraph prohibits the release of any information which would otherwise be available from any other information source available to the public if the original source is cited.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 145, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 9-692.3; W.S. 1977, § 9-9-103; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 62, § 1; 1989, ch. 10, § 1; 1990, ch. 73, § 2; 1991, ch. 123, § 1; 2001, ch. 109, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 53, § 1; 2003, ch. 64, § 1; 2005, ch. 49, § 1; 2006, ch. 54, § 1; ch. 114, § 1; 2011, ch. 144, § 2; 2012, ch. 74, § 1; 2013 ch. 2, § 1, effective February 8, 2013; 2015 ch. 131, § 1, effective March 4, 2015; 2016 ch. 118, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 201, § 1, effective March 13, 2017; 2017 ch. 202, § 2, effective July 1, 2018; 2018 ch. 113, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 174, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 36, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 49, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, added (d)(xiii).

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 210, § 2, effective July 1, 2005, in (d)(ix), substituted “patron transaction” for “circulation.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2006 amendments. —

The first 2006 amendment, by ch. 54, § 1, effective July 1, 2006, inserted “or through a verification system for motor vehicle insurance or bond as provided under W.S. 31-4-103(e)” in (d)(x).

The second 2006 amendment, by ch. 114, § 1, added “and” at the end of (d)(xii) and made a related change.

Pursuant to the conflicting legislation note in ch. 114, both have been given effect as set out above.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (d)(i), substituted “verdicts and written dockets as provided in W.S. 7-4-105(a)” for “autopsy reports.”

The 2013 amendment,

added (b)(viii).

Laws 2013, ch 2, § 1, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 8, 2013.

The 2015 amendment,

in (f), substituted “an order directing the custodian” for “an order directing the custodian.”

Laws 2015, ch. 131, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, added (d)(xvii).

The 2017 amendments. —

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 201, § 1, added (d)(xviii).

Laws 2017, ch. 201, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const.
Approved March 13, 2017.

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 202, § 2, effective July 1, 2018, added (d)(xviii) redesignated as (d)(xix).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been set out as reconciled by the legislative service office.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (b)(iii), inserted “agency or any other person” following “state institution”; and added (b)(viii).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (b)(iii), substituted “governmental entity” for “state institution, agency,” in (b)(iv), substituted “governmental entity” for “state or a political subdivision thereof” and “governmental entity” for “state or political subdivision,” in the introductory language in (b)(vi), (b)(vi)(C), and (b)(vi)(D), substituted “a governmental entity” for “the state or any of its political subdivisions”; in the introductory language in (d)(xiv) and (d)(xiv)(B), substituted “a governmental entity” for “the state or any agency, institution or political subdivision of the state,” in (d)(xv), substituted “a governmental entity” for “an agency,” and “governmental entity” for “agency”; in the introductory language in (f), substituted “aggrieved by the failure of a governmental entity to release records on the specified date mutually agreed upon pursuant to W.S. 16-4-202(c)(iv) or by the failure of a governmental entity to comply with an order of the ombudsman pursuant to W.S. 16-4-202(c)(v) may” for “denied the right to inspect any record covered by this act may,” designated part of existing (f) as (f)(i), and substituted “to direct” for “directing,” and added “record and to compel production of the record if applicable. An order issued by the district court under this paragraph may waive any fees charged by the state governmental entity” at the end, added (f)(ii), and made related changes.

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 36, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, in the introductory language of (d)(xiv) added “a surface or subsurface resource” following “conservation practice.”

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, added (d)(xx).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2016, ch. 118 § 3, provides:
“To the extent any provision of this act conflicts with any provision of 2016 Senate File 0001, as enacted into law, the provisions of Senate File 0001 shall control for the fiscal biennium commencing July 1, 2016 and ending June 30, 2018. This section shall not be interpreted to relieve the governor, legislature or any committee of the legislature from taking any action required in this act.
The governor may exercise authority granted under 2016 Senate File 0001 or this act in order to avoid a budget shortfall as defined in
W.S.

9-2-1002

for the fiscal biennium commencing July 1, 2016 and ending June 30, 2018.”

Applicability. —

Laws 2013, ch. 2, § 2, provides: “This act shall apply to all records or information as stated in this act relating to the search and selection process for which a board of trustees of an institution of higher education or its agent is considering applications on or after the effective date of this act, and shall include all such records or information whether developed or submitted prior to or after the effective date of this act.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (f), see § 16-4-201(a)(viii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Relief not available. —

Wyoming Public
Records Act did not afford a prisoner any remedies with respect to
his request for the department of correction's code of ethics where
he chose not to pursue either of the remedies available under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

16-4-203

, and he was ultimately, albeit belatedly, granted access
to the record. Guy v. Lampert, 2015 WY 148, 362 P.3d 331,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 2015).

Wyoming Public
Records Act did not give a district court the authority to grant a
prisoner's request for records related to the department of correction's
policy where he had not yet filed any requests to inspect those records,
and thus, he was asking the district court to rule on requests that
he might make in the future. Guy v. Lampert, 2015 WY 148, 362 P.3d 331,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 2015).

Inmate's constitutional claims in a Wyoming Public Records Act request failed because (1) limited Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 16-4-203(f) judicial review did not include them, and, (2) once records were provided, there was no other remedy. Guy v. Lampert, 2016 WY 77, 376 P.3d 499,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 2016).

Exemptions to public disclosure are to be construed narrowly.

Laramie River Conservation Council v. Dinger, 567 P.2d 731,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 276

(Wyo. 1977).

Redaction and disclosure appropriate. —

A district court may use redaction as one of the remedies to vindicate the public's interests in access to public records. Redaction is an appropriate tool to be used in circumstances concerning disclosure of public records, and is well established in case law, as well as in statutes. Allsop v. Cheyenne Newspapers, Inc., 2002 WY 22, 39 P.3d 1092,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2002).

Where expert issued a report to sheriff on measures required to prevent increased rate of attempted suicides at correctional facility the district court properly concluded that only a portion of the report fit within the statutory exemption to public disclosure under the Wyoming Public Records Act. Allsop v. Cheyenne Newspapers, Inc., 2002 WY 22, 39 P.3d 1092,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2002).

Prison officials, in complying with an order to produce information concerning their remedial plan to address shortcomings in the prison's internal investigation process, could not redact from investigative reports the non-confidential information concerning the conditions of confinement but were allowed to redact and not publish to the public or inmates confidential materials relating to medical, personnel, and criminal history records, and information which, under a reasonable person standard, was necessary to protect the safety of inmates cooperating in the investigation process. Skinner v. Uphoff, 2005 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 31945 (D. Wyo. Sept. 27, 2005), aff'd, 175 Fed. Appx. 255, 2006 U.S. App. LEXIS 9237 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2006).

Victim's records not released unless constitutionally material. —

Where the defendant was charged with taking indecent liberties with a minor, the nondisclosure to defense counsel of school records concerning the child did not deny the defendant his constitutional rights to a fair trial and to confront witnesses and to compulsory process, nor did the trial court err in conducting an in-camera review of the records and applying a standard of constitutional materiality in determining which records, if any, were to be released to defendant's counsel. Gale v. State, 792 P.2d 570,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 792 P.2d 570,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 1990).

Access to police records balanced with competing interests. —

Constitutional rights of access to police records may be, and in Wyoming are, conditioned by statutory restrictions and balanced with relevant competing-interest considerations. Sheridan Newspapers v. Sheridan, 660 P.2d 785,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1983).

But provisions construed favoring disclosure. —

The Wyoming Public Records Act, §§

16-4-201

through

16-4-205

, will receive a liberal construction in favor of disclosure and against withholding, and exemptions will be construed narrowly. Sheridan Newspapers v. Sheridan, 660 P.2d 785,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1983).

Blanket withdrawal of police logs and reports forbidden. —

The blanket withdrawal of the police rolling log and case reports from public inspection is violative of statutory and constitutional rights. Sheridan Newspapers v. Sheridan, 660 P.2d 785,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1983).

List of people possessing concealed gun permit. —

It was error for the director of the Wyoming Division of Criminal Investigation to be ordered to provide a newspaper editor with a list of people possessing a permit or license to carry a concealed weapon in the county, since the records were not public. Pagel v. Franscell, 2002 WY 169, 57 P.3d 1226,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 190

(Wyo. 2002).

Names of federal-aid project workers disclosable. —

The phrase “sociological data,” as used in subsection (d)(i), does not authorize the Wyoming transportation department to withhold from disclosure, for purpose of verifying compliance with wage laws, names and addresses on certified payrolls of individuals working on federal-aid projects. Wyoming Dep't of Transp. v. International Union of Operating Eng'rs Local Union 800, 908 P.2d 970,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 231

(Wyo. 1995).

Legislative intent concerning medical records. —

The legislature intended that the exemption in subsection (d)(vii) is not limited to medical information only. Houghton v. Franscell, 870 P.2d 1050,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1994).

Physicians' financial statements. —

Physicians were entitled to an exception from disclosure with regard to financial statements they were required to submit to the district under contract because: (1) disclosure of the physicians' financial reports would be likely to impair the future ability of the district to obtain necessary information; (2) the physicians could not be expected to turn over sensitive financial data if the district was in turn required by law to disseminate that information to the public; and (3) release of the reports would be likely to cause substantial harm to the competitive process of the physicians. Sublette County Rural Health Care Dist. v. Miley, 942 P.2d 1101,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 1997).

Deliberative process privilege. —

Supreme court waited to decide whether the Wyoming Public Records Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

16-4-201

through

16-4-205

, incorporated the deliberative process privilege when it was presented with a case in which it was shown that the records sought to be disclosed would fall within the privilege.
Freudenthal v. Cheyenne Newspapers, Inc., 2010 WY 80, 233 P.3d 933,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 2010).

Deliberative
process privilege is incorporated into Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 16-4-203(b)(v) because the privilege is recognized in Wyoming common
law. Aland v. Mead, 2014 WY 83, 327 P.3d 752,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 2014).

When asserting
the deliberative process privilege as a basis for withholding disclosure
of public documents, the burden remains upon a custodian of the records
to overcome the presumption in favor of disclosure as to each document
withheld (or redacted), and the custodian must be prepared to provide
a written statement of grounds for denial upon request of an applicant,
with sufficient information to allow the applicant to evaluate the
basis for denial. Aland v. Mead, 2014 WY 83, 327 P.3d 752,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 2014).

When asserting
the deliberative process privilege as a basis for withholding disclosure
of public documents, a custodian must insure that the decision to
withhold the records satisfies all prongs of the test: 1) it is an
interagency or intraagency communication, 2) the communication is
pre-decisional and deliberative, and 3) disclosure is not in the
public
interest. Aland v. Mead, 2014 WY 83, 327 P.3d 752,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 2014).

First requirement
of the deliberative process privilege is that a communication be
between
employees or officials within an agency or between agencies
of the
State. Aland v. Mead, 2014 WY 83, 327 P.3d 752,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 2014).

For a document
to be “pre-decisional,” under the deliberative process
privilege, the document must be one that is generated prior to the
government's adoption of a policy, so the exemption covers recommendations,
draft documents, proposals, suggestions, and other subjective documents
which would inaccurately reflect or prematurely disclose the views
of the agency, suggesting as agency position that which is as yet
only a personal position. Aland v. Mead, 2014 WY 83, 327 P.3d 752,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 2014).

To test if
disclosure of a document is likely to adversely affect the purposes
of the deliberative process privilege, courts ask if the document
is so candid that public disclosure is likely to stifle frank communication
within an agency, whether the document is recommendatory in nature
or is a draft of what will become a final document, and whether the
document is deliberative in nature, weighing the pros and cons of
agency adoption of one viewpoint or another. Aland v. Mead, 2014 WY 83, 327 P.3d 752,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 2014).

Under the
deliberative process privilege, even if a document is predecisional
at the time the document is prepared, the document can lose that
status
if the document is adopted, formally or informally, as an
agency position
on an issue or is used by the agency in the agency's
dealings with
the public. Aland v. Mead, 2014 WY 83, 327 P.3d 752,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 2014).

Reasons to be given for withdrawal of records. —

When a custodian withdraws records, reasons therefor must be given so that these reasons may provide grounds for review should court action result. If the custodian gives either no reasons or inadequate reasons for withdrawal, appropriate legal action is available to force an automatic disclosure of the records. Sheridan Newspapers v. Sheridan, 660 P.2d 785,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1983).

Factors to be considered in nondisclosure decision. —

See Sheridan Newspapers v. Sheridan, 660 P.2d 785,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1983).

Interagency memoranda provision similar to federal provision. —

With respect to interagency memoranda, the Wyoming provision is similar to the federal Freedom of Information Act. Laramie River Conservation Council v. Dinger, 567 P.2d 731,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 276

(Wyo. 1977).

And transcript of industrial siting council hearing not “memoranda.” —

The recording of a hearing by the Wyoming industrial siting council to consider the granting of a permit authorizing an electrical power cooperative to build certain units of a power plant, in the absence of any other verbatim report, is required by law to be made and kept on file by the agency. That requirement alone takes the transcript outside of the scope of the public records law classification of “memoranda.” Laramie River Conservation Council v. Dinger, 567 P.2d 731,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 276

(Wyo. 1977).

Tape of university committee meeting was a public record. —

Tape of a meeting of a committee regarding the misconduct of a university's former manager of transportation services should have been considered a public record because the university took possession of the tape in connection with an internal personnel investigation, which was subject to inspection by any member of the public absent the application of any statutory exemption.
Sheaffer v. State ex rel. Univ. of Wyo., 2006 WY 99, 139 P.3d 468,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 2006).

Cited

in

Laramie County Sch. Dist. No. One v. Cheyenne Newspapers, 2011 WY 55, 250 P.3d 522,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Mar. 29, 2011).

Quoted in

Williams v. Matheny, 2017 WY 85, 398 P.3d 521,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Constitutional Law — A Constitutional Right of Access to State-Held Information. Sheridan Newspapers, Inc. v. City of Sheridan, 660 P.2d 785,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 719 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Restricting public access to judicial records of state courts, 84 ALR3d 598.

What constitutes preliminary drafts or notes provided by or for state or local governmental agency, or intra-agency memorandums, exempt from disclosure or inspection under state freedom of information acts, 26 ALR4th 639.

What constitutes personal matters exempt from disclosure by invasion of privacy exemption under state freedom of information act, 26 ALR4th 666.

Patient's right to disclosure of his or her own medical records under state freedom of information act, 26 ALR4th 701.

What constitutes “trade secrets” exempt from disclosure under state freedom of information act, 27 ALR4th 773.

Propriety of publishing identity of sexual assault victim, 40 ALR5th 787.

Power of court under 5 USC § 552(a)(4)(B) to examine agency records in camera to determine propriety of withholding records, 60 ALR Fed 416.

Waiver by federal government agency as affecting agency's right to claim exemption from disclosure requirements, under the Freedom of Information Act ( 5 USC § 552(b)), 67 ALR Fed 595.

What constitutes “Trade Secrets and Commercial or Financial Information Obtained From Person and Privileged or Confidential,” exempt from disclosure under Freedom of Information Act ( 5 USC § 552(b)(4)) (FOIA), 139 ALR Fed 225.

What is agency subject to Privacy Act provisions ( 5 U.S.C. § 552a), 150 ALR Fed 521.

What are “records” of agency which must be made available under Freedom of Information Act (5 USC § 552(a)(3)) 153 ALR Fed 571.

What are interagency or intra-agency memorandums or letters exempt from disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act ( 5 U.S.C. 552(b)), 168 ALR Fed 143.

What matters are exempt from disclosure under Freedom of Information Act ( 5 U.S.C. § 552(b)) as “specifically authorized under criteria established by an executive order to be kept secret in the interest of national defense or foreign policy,” 169 ALR Fed 495.

What constitutes “confidential source” within Freedom of Information Act exemption permitting nondisclosure of confidential source and, in some instances, of information furnished by confidential source ( 5 U.S.C. § 552(b)), 171 ALR Fed 193.

Construction and application of FOIA exemption 7(f), 5 U.S.C.A. § 552(b)(7)(F), which permits withholding of information compiled for law enforcement purposes if disclosure could reasonably be expected to endanger life or physical safety, 184 ALR Fed 435.

Use of affidavits to substantiate federal agency's claim of exemption from request for documents under Freedom of Information Act ( 5 U.S.C.A. § 552), 187 ALR Fed 1.

When are government records reasonably “expected to interfere with enforcement proceedings” so as to be exempt from disclosure under Freedom of Information Act provision ( 5 U.S.C.A. § 552(b)(7)(a)) exempting any information “compiled for law enforcement purposes” whenever it “could reasonably be expected to interfere with enforcement proceedings,” 189 ALR Fed 1.

§ 16-4-204.
Right of inspection; copies, printouts or photographs; fees.

In all cases in which a person has the right to inspect and copy any public records he may request that he be furnished copies, printouts or photographs for a reasonable fee to be set by the official custodian. Where fees for certified copies or other copies, printouts or photographs of the record are specifically prescribed by law, the specific fees shall apply. Nothing in this section shall be construed as authorizing a fee to be charged as a condition of making a public record available for inspection.

If the custodian does not have the facilities for making copies, printouts or photographs of records which the applicant has the right to inspect, then the applicant shall be granted access to the records for the purpose of making copies, printouts or photographs. The copies, printouts or photographs shall be made while the records are in the possession, custody and control of the custodian thereof and are subject to the supervision of the custodian. When practical the copy work shall be made in the place where the records are kept, but if it is impractical to do so, the custodian may allow arrangements to be made for this purpose. If other facilities are necessary the cost of providing them shall be paid by the person desiring a copy, printout or photograph of the records. The official custodian may establish a reasonable schedule of time for making copies, printouts or photographs and may charge a reasonable fee for the services rendered by him or his deputy in supervising the copying, printing out or photographing as he may charge for furnishing copies under this section.

After July 1, 2003, any fees or charges assessed by a custodian of a public record shall first be authorized by duly enacted or adopted statute, rule, resolution, ordinance, executive order or other like authority.

All state agencies may adopt rules and regulations pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act establishing reasonable fees and charges that may be assessed for the costs and services set forth in this section.

The department of administration and information shall adopt uniform rules for the use of state agencies establishing procedures, fees, costs and charges for inspection, copies and production of public records under W.S. 16-4-202(d)(i), 16-4-203(h)(i) and

16-4-204

.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 145, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 9-692.4; W.S. 1977, § 9-9-104; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 53, § 1; 2014 ch. 109, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Cross references. —

As to reproduction of public records of political subdivisions generally, see §

9-2-413

.

As to duty of county clerk as to reproduction of records, see §

18-3-402

.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, added (e).

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

“Hospital records” does not include financial agreements. —

Disclosure of financial agreements between a county and a physician is not an unwarranted invasion of privacy, and such financial agreements are not the type of record the legislature sought to shield from inspection when it exempted hospital records from disclosure. Houghton v. Franscell, 870 P.2d 1050,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1994).

Quoted in

Cheyenne Newspapers, Inc. v. Bd. of Trs. Sch. Dist. No. One, 2016 WY 113, 384 P.3d 679,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 2016).